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DIC2B-03

DTC P0230/78 | Fuel Pump Primary Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

In the diagram below, when the engine is cranked, current flows from terminal STAR of the engine control
ECU to the starter relay coil and also current flows to terminal STA of the engine control ECU (STA signal).
When the STA signal and NE signal are input to the engine control ECU, the Tr1 is turned ON, current flows
to the coil of the circuit opening relay, the relay switches on, power is supplied to the fuel pump, and the fuel
pump operates.

While the NE signal is generated (engine running), the engine control ECU keeps the Tr1 ON (circuit opening
relay ON) and the fuel pump also keeps operating.

The fuel pump speed is controlled at two levels (high speed or low speed) by the condition of the engine
(starting, light load, heavy load). When the engine starts (STA ON), the Tr2 in the engine control ECU is OFF,
so the fuel pump relay closes and battery positive voltage is applied directly to the fuel pump. The fuel pump
operates at high speed.

After the engine starts during idling or light loads, since the Tr2 goes ON, power is supplied to the fuel pump
via the fuel pump resistor. The fuel pump operates at low speed.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

¢ Openorshortinfuel pumprelay circuit
e Fuel pumprelay

P0230/78 Openor shortinfuel pump relay circuit « Circuitopeningrelay

e Fuel pump

* Engine control ECU
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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HINT:
This diagnostic chart is based on premise that engine is started. If the engine is not started, proceed to prob-
lem symptoms table on DI-34.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions when

a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air —fuel ratiowaslean orrich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Checkvoltage betweenterminal FPRandE 1 ofenginecontrol ECU.

CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals of E7 and E9 engine
control ECU connectors.

OK:
Tester Connection Condition Specified Condition
FPR(E7 -33) - E1(E9 -1) STAsignal ON 9to 14V
FPR(E7 -33) - E1 (E9 -1) STAsignal OFF 0to3V

P A19522

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.

Engine Control ECU Connector
A1963 OK
> RM630E, pageFl -74).

NG

2 [ Check fuel pump relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the fuel pump relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
5 Inspect the fuel pump relay.
o | ok
v Tester Connection Specified Condition
3-4 Below1 Q
3-5 10k Q orhigher
aali 3_5 Below1 Q
(Apply battery voltage terminal 1 and 2)

NG> Replace fuel pump relay.
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3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel pump relay
and engine control ECU.

Engine Room J/B: PREPARATION:
[o] (@) Remove the fuel pump relay from the engine room J/B.
(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
O =
o ||g E CHECK:
= = Measure the resistance between wire harness side connectors.
@ E S OK:
@ Fuel Pump Tester Connection Specified Condition
Relay Engine Room J/B (Fuel pump relay ter-
. Below 1 Q
c A21342 minal 1) - FPR (E7-33)
Engine Room J/B (Fuel pump relay ter-
minal 1) or FPR (E7-33) - 10 k< or higher
Body ground

@wmmﬁﬁawt

. N R ir or repl harn r conn r.
FPanmeControl ECU Connector G epair or replace harness or connecto

A21023

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630, page FI-74).
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